Utah statutes.
9-6-204.   Utah Arts Council Board of Directors.
(1)  There is created within the department the Board of Directors of the Utah
Arts Council.
(2) (a)  The board shall consist of 13 members appointed by the governor to
four-year terms of office with the consent of the Senate.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (2)(a), the governor
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately
half of the board is appointed every two years.
(c)  Nine board members shall be working artists in the following areas:
(i)  visual arts;
(ii)  architecture or design;
(iii)  literature;
(iv)  music;
(v)  sculpture;
(vi)  folklore or folk arts;
(vii)  theatre;
(viii)  dance; and
(ix)  media arts.
(d)  Four board members shall be citizens knowledgeable in the arts.
(3)  The members shall be appointed from the state at large with due
consideration for geographical representation.
(4) When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term by the governor within one month
from the time of vacancy.
(5)  Seven members of the board constitute a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(6)  The governor shall annually select one of the board members as chair.
(7)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(8)  A member may not receive gifts, prizes, or awards of money from the
purchasing fund of the division during the member's term of office.
